District of Columbia statutes.
22-1403

False personation before court, officers, notaries.

(a)

Whoever falsely personates another person before any court of record or judge thereof, or clerk of court, or any officer in the District authorized to administer oaths or take the acknowledgment of deeds or other instruments or to grant marriage licenses or accepts domestic partnership registrations, with intent to defraud, shall be imprisoned for not less than 1 year nor more than 5 years.

(a-1)

In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term “domestic partnership” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(4).

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1330, ch. 854, § 859
Feb. 17, 1909, 35 Stat. 623, ch. 134
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 23(b), 55 DCR 6758
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(n), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-1303.
1973 Ed., § 22-1303.
D.C. Law 17-231 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “Whoever falsely personates another person before any court of record or judge thereof, or clerk of court, or any officer in the District authorized to administer oaths or take the acknowledgment of deeds or other instruments or to grant marriage licenses, with intent to defraud, shall be imprisoned for not less than 1 year nor more than 5 years.”
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added (a-1).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(n) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.